Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.105

Chapter not applicable to officers and employees of state convention and trade center.

The provisions of this chapter shall not be applicable to the officers and employees of the nonprofit corporation formed under *chapter 67.40 RCW.

[ 1984 c 210 s 6. Formerly RCW 41.40.810.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: A majority of chapter 67.40 RCW was repealed by 2010 1st sp.s. c 15 s 14, effective November 30, 2010. RCW 67.40.020 was repealed by 2010 1st sp.s. c 15 s 15, effective December 30, 2010.

Savings—Severability—1984 c 210: See notes following RCW 43.01.045.